Utah statutes.
59-10-529.   Overpayment of tax -- Credits -- Refunds.
(1)  If there has been an overpayment of any tax imposed by this chapter, the
amount of overpayment is credited as follows:
(a)  against any income tax then due from the taxpayer;
(b)  against:
(i)  the amount of any judgment against the taxpayer, including one ordering
the payment of a fine or of restitution to a victim under Title 77, Chapter
38a, Crime Victims Restitution Act, obtained through due process of law by any
entity of state government; or
(ii)  subject to Subsection (3), any child support obligation that is due or
past due, as determined by the Office of Recovery Services in the Department
of Human Services and after notice and an opportunity for an adjudicative
proceeding, as provided in Subsection (2); or
(c)  subject to Subsection (3), (5), (6), or (7), as bail, to ensure the
appearance of the taxpayer before the appropriate authority to resolve an
outstanding warrant against the taxpayer for which bail is due, if a court of
competent jurisdiction has not approved an alternative form of payment.
(2)  If a balance remains after an overpayment is credited in accordance with
Subsection (1), the balance shall be refunded to the taxpayer.
(3)  Bail described in Subsection (1)(c) may be applied to any fine or
forfeiture:
(a)  that is due and related to a warrant that is outstanding on or after
February 16, 1984; and
(b)  in accordance with Subsections (5) and (6).
(4) (a)  The amount of an overpayment may be credited against an obligation
described in Subsection (1)(b)(ii) if the Office of Recovery Services has sent
written notice to the taxpayer's last-known address or the address on file
under Section 62A-11-304.4, stating:
(i)  the amount of child support that is due or past due as of the date of the
notice or other specified date;
(ii)  that any overpayment shall be applied to reduce the amount of due or
past-due child support specified in the notice; and
(iii)  that the taxpayer may contest the amount of past-due child support
specified in the notice by filing a written request for an adjudicative
proceeding with the office within 15 days of the notice being sent.
(b) In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the Office of Recovery Services shall establish rules to implement this
Subsection (4), including procedures, in accordance with the other provisions
of this section, to ensure:
(i)  prompt reimbursement to the taxpayer of any amount of an overpayment that
was credited against a child support obligation in error; and
(ii)  prompt distribution of properly credited funds to the obligee parent.
(5)  The amount of an overpayment may be credited against bail described in
Subsection (1)(c) if:
(a)  a court has issued a warrant for the arrest of the taxpayer for failure
to post bail, appear, or otherwise satisfy the terms of a citation, summons,
or court order; and
(b)  a notice of intent to apply the overpayment as bail on the issued warrant
has been sent to the person's current address on file with the commission.
(6) (a) (i)  The commission shall deliver an overpayment applied as bail to
the court that issued the warrant of arrest.
(ii)  The clerk of the court is authorized to endorse the check or commission
warrant of payment on behalf of the payees and deposit the monies in the court
treasury.
(b) (i)  The court receiving an overpayment applied as bail shall order
withdrawal of the warrant for arrest of the taxpayer if:
(A)  the case is a case for which a personal appearance of the taxpayer is not
required; and
(B)  the dollar amount of the overpayment represents the full dollar amount of
bail.
(ii)  In a case except for a case described in Subsection (6)(b)(i):
(A)  the court receiving the overpayment applied as bail is not required to
order the withdrawal of the warrant of arrest of the taxpayer during the
40-day period; and
(B)  the taxpayer may be arrested on the warrant.
(c) (i)  If a taxpayer fails to respond to the notice required by Subsection
(5)(b), or to resolve the warrant within 40 days after the notice is sent
under Subsection (5)(b):
(A)  the overpayment applied as bail is forfeited; and
(B)  notice of the forfeiture shall be mailed to the taxpayer at the current
address on file with the commission.
(ii)  A court may issue another warrant or allow the original warrant to
remain in force if:
(A)  the taxpayer has not complied with an order of the court;
(B)  the taxpayer has failed to appear and respond to a criminal charge for
which a personal appearance is required; or
(C)  the taxpayer has paid partial but not full bail in a case for which a
personal appearance is not required.
(d)  If the alleged violations named in a warrant are later resolved in favor
of the taxpayer, the bail amount shall be remitted to the taxpayer.
(7)  The fine and bail forfeiture provisions of this section apply to all
warrants and fines issued in cases charging a taxpayer with a felony, a
misdemeanor, or an infraction described in this section which are outstanding
on or after February 16, 1984.
(8)  If the amount allowable as a credit for tax withheld from a taxpayer
exceeds the tax to which the credit relates, the excess is considered an
overpayment.
(9) (a)  Subject to Subsection (9)(b), a claim for credit or refund of an
overpayment that is attributable to a net operating loss carry back or carry
forward shall be filed within three years from the due date of the return for
the taxable year of the net operating loss.
(b)  The three-year period described in Subsection (9)(a) shall be extended by
any extension of time provided in statute for filing the return described in
Subsection (9)(a).
(10)  If there has been an overpayment of a tax that is required to be
deducted and withheld under Section 59-10-402, a refund shall be made to the
employer only to the extent that the amount of overpayment is not deducted and
withheld by the employer.
(11)  If there is no tax liability for a period in which an amount is paid
under this chapter, the amount is an overpayment.
(12)  If a tax under this chapter is assessed or collected after the
expiration of the applicable period of limitation, that amount is an
overpayment.
(13) (a)  A taxpayer may file a claim for a credit or refund of an overpayment
within two years from the date a notice of change, notice of correction, or
amended return is required to be filed with the commission if the taxpayer is
required to:
(i)  report a change or correction in income reported on the taxpayer's
federal income tax return;
(ii)  report a change or correction that is treated in the same manner as if
the change or correction were an overpayment for federal income tax purposes;
or
(iii)  file an amended return with the commission.
(b)  If a report or amended return is not filed within 90 days, interest on
any resulting refund or credit ceases to accrue after the 90-day period.
(c)  The amount of the credit or refund may not exceed the amount of the
reduction in tax attributable to the federal change, correction, or items
amended on the taxpayer's amended federal income tax return.
(d)  Except as provided in Subsection (13)(a), this Subsection (13) does not
affect the amount or the time within which a claim for credit or refund may be
filed.
(14)  A credit or refund may not be allowed or made if an overpayment is less
than $1.
(15)  The amount of a credit or refund may not exceed the tax paid during the
three years immediately preceding the filing of the claim, or if no claim is
filed, then during the three years immediately preceding the allowance of the
credit or refund.
(16)  In the case of an overpayment of tax by an employer under Part 4,
Withholding of Tax, a refund or credit shall be made to the employer only to
the extent that the amount of the overpayment is not deducted and withheld
from wages under this chapter.
(17) (a)  If a taxpayer that is allowed a refund under this chapter dies, the
commission may make payment to the personal representative of the taxpayer's
estate.
(b)  If there is no personal representative of the taxpayer's estate, payment
may be made to those persons who establish entitlement to inherit the property
of the decedent in the proportions established in Title 75, Utah Uniform
Probate Code.
(18)  If an overpayment relates to a change in net income described in
Subsection 59-10-536(2)(a), a credit may be allowed or a refund paid any time
before the expiration of the period within which a deficiency may be assessed.
(19)  An overpayment of a tax imposed by this chapter shall accrue interest at
the rate and in the manner prescribed in Section 59-1-402.
